Nevada, session 83, AB208.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 237 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as authorized by this section, a covered entity shall
not use a federally reviewed product or provide or dispense a
federally reviewed product to a resident for use, regardless of how
the product was obtained, in a manner that:
(a) Is contrary to the terms of use established for the federally
reviewed product by the patent holder, manufacturer or
distributor;
(b) Is inconsistent with any written directions, instructions,
limitations or intended usages for the federally reviewed product
that:
(1) Accompany the product;
(2) Are printed on the product; or
(3) Are printed on any label or packaging for the product;
or
(c) Is not one of the approved uses or purposes of the federally
reviewed product, if the product is approved for specific uses or
purposes by an agency of the Federal Government.
2. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 5, a covered
entity may use, provide or dispense a federally reviewed product in
a manner described in subsection 1 if:
(a) The covered entity transmits a written notice to the patent
holder and the manufacturer and distributor of the federally
reviewed product, if different from the patent holder, that:
(1) Sufficiently identifies the federally reviewed product
that the covered entity seeks to use, provide or dispense; and
(2) Describes the specific manner in or purposes for which
the covered entity plans to use, provide or dispense the federally
reviewed product; and
(b) At least 30 days have elapsed after the transmission of the
notice described in paragraph (a) without the patent holder,
manufacturer or distributor of the federally reviewed product
transmitting an objection to the covered entity pursuant to
subsection 3.
-
*AB208_R1*

– 3 –
3. If a patent holder or a manufacturer or distributor of a
federally reviewed product has reason to believe that a covered
entity is using, providing or dispensing or plans to use, provide or
dispense a federally reviewed product in a manner described in
subsection 1, based on a notice received pursuant to subsection 2
or for any other reason, the patent holder, manufacturer or
distributor may object to such use by transmitting a written notice
to the covered entity that:
(a) Identifies the federally reviewed product at issue;
(b) Specifically describes the manner of use of the federally
reviewed product to which the patent holder, manufacturer or
distributor, as applicable, objects;
(c) Explains the reasons that the patent holder, manufacturer
or distributor believes such manner of use of the federally
reviewed product violates subsection 1; and
(d) Requests that the covered entity cease and desist from
using, providing or dispensing the federally reviewed product in
the manner described in paragraph (b).
4. A patent holder or a manufacturer or distributor of a
federally reviewed product may withdraw an objection made
pursuant to subsection 3 by transmitting a written notice to the
covered entity to which the patent holder, manufacturer or
distributor, as applicable, transmitted the objection pursuant to
subsection 3. The notice must identify:
(a) The federally reviewed product at issue; and
(b) The manner of use of the federally reviewed product
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 3 to which the patent
holder, manufacturer or distributor, as applicable, no longer
objects.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsection 6, upon receiving a written notice described in
subsection 3 from a patent holder or the manufacturer or
distributor of a federally reviewed product, a covered entity shall
immediately cease and desist from using, providing or dispensing
the federally reviewed product in the manner described in the
notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3. A covered entity
may use, provide or dispense the federally reviewed product in
such a manner if the covered entity subsequently receives a written
notice withdrawing any objection for that particular manner of
use pursuant to subsection 4 from all patent holders,
manufacturers and distributors that have objected to that
particular manner of use pursuant to subsection 3.
6. A covered entity may provide or dispense a federally
reviewed product to a resident to be used in a manner described in
subsection 1 if the resident to whom the product is provided or
-
*AB208_R1*

– 4 –
dispensed provides informed consent to the covered entity with
respect to the particular use and receipt of the product. A covered
entity is not required to provide the notice required pursuant to
subsection 2 to the patent holder, manufacturer and distributor of
a federally reviewed product that is provided or dispensed in a
manner consistent with the provisions of this subsection.
7. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to
require a covered entity to perform any action or use, provide or
dispense a federally reviewed product in a manner that is in
violation of any condition to the receipt of federal money.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Covered entity” means:
(1) A governmental entity that operates or administers a
covered facility; and
(2) A government-funded entity that:
(I) Maintains a contract with a governmental entity to
provide services in or assist in the operations of a covered facility;
or
(II) Operates or administers a covered facility.
(b) “Covered facility” means:
(1) A facility that provides care, treatment or training of
consumers and persons with mental illnesses, including, without
limitation, the facilities listed in NRS 433.233 and 433B.110; or
(2) A community correctional center, conservation camp,
facility of minimum security, prison or other place of confinement
for the custody, care or training of persons sentenced to
imprisonment.
(c) “Federally reviewed product” means any product or
invention that:
(1) Is currently protected by, or has ever been protected by,
a patent issued by the United States Patent and Trademark Office;
and
(2) Has received or is pending approval by the United
States Food and Drug Administration or the United States
Department of Agriculture.
(d) “Governmental entity” means the State of Nevada or any
agency, institution, board, commission, bureau, council,
department, division, office, authority or other unit of government
of the State of Nevada.
(e) “Government-funded entity” means any entity that received
50 percent or more of its operating budget in the immediately
preceding calendar year from any combination of:
(1) One or more governmental entities; or
(2) Appropriations, grants or transfers from the State
General Fund or any other fund or account established by law.
-
*AB208_R1*

– 5 –
(f) “Patent holder” means:
(1) A person or entity that holds a valid patent for a
federally reviewed product issued by the United States Patent and
Trademark Office; or
(2) If the patent issued by the United States Patent and
Trademark Office for a federally approved product is expired, the
person or entity that held the patent at the time of the expiration.
(g) “Resident” means a person who is ordered into the custody
of, confined in or otherwise resides within a covered facility.
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB208_R1*